Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.090

Agencies' contracting authority regarding electricity, utilities' powers, preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to increase or decrease existing authority of any public agency of this state to enter into agreements or contracts with any other public agency of this state or of any other state or the United States with regard to the generation, transmission, or distribution of electricity or the existing powers of any private or public utilities.

[ 1967 c 239 s 10.]